Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LEGISLATIVE WORKING GROUP ON INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Working group established. new text end new text begin A working group is established to review and examine state and county demographic data related to gaps in the availability and delivery of disability services for people with intellectual or developmental disabilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The legislative working group on intellectual and developmental disabilities consists of the following 18 members: new text end new text begin (1) 16 members of the legislature appointed by the respective leaders of the caucuses of each chamber: new text end new text begin (i) the chair and ranking minority member, or as applicable the cochairs, of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over programs serving people with intellectual and developmental disabilities at the Department of Human Services; new text end new text begin (ii) the chair and ranking minority member, or as applicable the cochairs, of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over programs serving people with intellectual and developmental disabilities at the Department of Labor and Industry; new text end new text begin (iii) the chair and ranking minority member, or as applicable the cochairs, of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over housing; and new text end new text begin (iv) the chairs and ranking minority members, or as applicable the cochairs, of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over programs serving people with intellectual and developmental disabilities at the Department of Education; new text end new text begin (2) one member appointed by the county board of the county with the densest population that is willing to participate; and new text end new text begin (3) one member appointed by the county board of the county with the largest geographic territory that is willing to participate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) "Direct support professional" means an individual employed to provide documented direct support services to a person with an intellectual or developmental disability. new text end new text begin (b) "Disability services" means services for people with intellectual or developmental disabilities provided by a county, billed to a county, managed by a county, or subject to county case management. new text end new text begin (c) "Person with an intellectual or developmental disability" means a person who has been diagnosed with an intellectual or developmental disability or related condition as defined by any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) the current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders; new text end new text begin (2) the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; new text end new text begin (3) the National Institutes of Health; new text end new text begin (4) Minnesota Statutes; or new text end new text begin (5) Minnesota Rules, including Minnesota Rules, part 9525.0016, subpart 2, items A to E. new text end new text begin (d) "Summary data" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 13.02, subdivision 19. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms; vacancies. new text end new text begin (a) Each appointing authority must make appointments within 30 calendar days following the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriate appointing authority must fill a vacancy on the working group by appointing a member in a manner that will preserve the representation of the standing legislative committees and counties listed in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Compensation. new text end new text begin Legislative members may receive per-diem compensation and reimbursement for expenses according to the rules of their respective bodies. Other members of the working group are eligible for per-diem compensation as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Chair; convening. new text end new text begin (a) One member appointed by the senate majority leader must convene the first working group meeting on or before August 15, 2026. The working group must meet at least monthly. new text end new text begin (b) Working group meetings must be open to the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Administrative support. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide meeting space, technical and administrative support, and staff support for the working group. The working group may hold meetings in any publicly accessible location in the Capitol complex that is equipped with technology that can facilitate remote testimony. new text end new text begin (b) The working group may hold meetings outside the Capitol complex, including in rural areas of the state, at the times and places it designates to gather input directly from self-advocates with intellectual or developmental disabilities, families of people with intellectual or developmental disabilities, legal guardians, counties, and disability service providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Working group duties; fact finding, research, and recommendations. new text end new text begin The members of the working group must: new text end new text begin (1) develop expertise and knowledge about the characteristics of people with intellectual or developmental disabilities; new text end new text begin (2) review state and county data, including demographic summary data, related to disability services for adults with intellectual or developmental disabilities to identify service shortcomings and gaps related to case management, housing, work options, transportation, availability of qualified direct support professionals, life enrichment opportunities, and day services; new text end new text begin (3) review data to identify long-term educational needs; and new text end new text begin (4) review data to identify how many people with intellectual or developmental disabilities live with aging family members. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, the working group must submit a written report with recommendations to the standing legislative committees of the senate and house of representatives from which the working group membership is drawn according to subdivision 2. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of the working group's work; new text end new text begin (2) an itemized list with descriptions of identified disability services gaps and shortcomings in 87 counties; and new text end new text begin (3) recommendations for future use of demographic data in making decisions related to programs and disability services for people with intellectual or developmental disabilities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEGISLATIVE WORKING GROUP ON INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the legislative working group on intellectual and developmental disabilities. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end